third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.aff
FLAG num
SFX 655 N 10
SFX 655 0 ондан .
SFX 655 0 онданам .
SFX 655 0 онданат .
SFX 655 0 онданатро .
SFX 655 0 онданаш .
SFX 655 0 онданашон .
SFX 655 0 онданашро .
SFX 655 0 ондани .
SFX 655 0 онданро .
SFX 655 0 ондану .

SFX 656 N 1
SFX 656 0 онданҳои .

SFX 657 N 2
SFX 657 0 онданӣ .
SFX 657 0 онданием .

SFX 659 N 5
SFX 659 0 ониҳо .
SFX 659 0 ониҳои .
SFX 659 0 ониҳоро .
SFX 659 0 ониҳост .
SFX 659 0 ониҳою .

SFX 660 N 2
SFX 660 0 ониҳое .
SFX 660 0 ониҳоеро .

SFX 661 N 13
SFX 661 0 онид .
SFX 661 0 онидам .
SFX 661 0 онидамаш .
SFX 661 0 онидаму .
SFX 661 0 ониданд .
SFX 661 0 ониданду .
SFX 661 0 онидаст .
SFX 661 0 онидаш .
SFX 661 0 онидашон .
SFX 661 0 онидед .
SFX 661 0 онидем .
SFX 661 0 онидему .
SFX 661 0 ониду .

SFX 662 N 3
SFX 662 0 онидӣ .
SFX 662 0 онидию .
SFX 662 0 онидияш .

SFX 663 N 18
SFX 663 0 онида .
SFX 663 0 онидаам .
SFX 663 0 онидаамон .
SFX 663 0 онидаанд .
SFX 663 0 онидаанду .
SFX 663 0 онидааст .
SFX 663 0 онидаасту .
SFX 663 0 онидаатон .
SFX 663 0 онидааш .
SFX 663 0 онидаашон .
SFX 663 0 онидаашро .
SFX 663 0 онидаву .
SFX 663 0 онидаед .
SFX 663 0 онидаем .
SFX 663 0 онидаи .
SFX 663 0 онидаро .
SFX 663 0 онидаю .
SFX 663 0 онидаӣ .

SFX 664 N 1
SFX 664 0 онидаиву .

SFX 665 N 1
SFX 665 0 онидагӣ .

SFX 666 N 1
SFX 666 0 онидагистӣ .

SFX 667 N 1
SFX 667 0 онидае .

SFX 668 N 1
SFX 668 0 онидаме .

SFX 669 N 9
SFX 669 0 онидан .
SFX 669 0 ониданам .
SFX 669 0 ониданатонро .
SFX 669 0 ониданаш .
SFX 669 0 ониданашон .
SFX 669 0 ониданашро .
SFX 669 0 онидани .
SFX 669 0 ониданро .
SFX 669 0 онидану .

SFX 670 N 2
SFX 670 0 ониданҳо .
SFX 670 0 ониданҳои .

SFX 671 N 6
SFX 671 0 ониданӣ .
SFX 671 0 ониданиам .
SFX 671 0 ониданианд .
SFX 671 0 ониданием .
SFX 671 0 ониданист .
SFX 671 0 ониданиям .

SFX 672 N 3
SFX 672 0 оние .
SFX 672 0 ониеро .
SFX 672 0 ониест .

SFX 673 N 3
SFX 673 0 ониён .
SFX 673 0 ониёни .
SFX 673 0 ониёнро .

SFX 674 N 1
SFX 674 0 ониёне .

SFX 675 N 1
SFX 675 0 онитар .

SFX 676 N 2
SFX 676 0 ониш .
SFX 676 0 онишро .

SFX 677 N 1
SFX 677 0 оно .

SFX 678 N 1
SFX 678 0 онов .

SFX 679 N 2
SFX 679 0 онтар .
SFX 679 0 онтарам .

SFX 680 N 3
SFX 680 0 онтарин .
SFX 680 0 онтарини .
SFX 680 0 онтаринро .

SFX 681 N 1
SFX 681 0 онча .

SFX 682 N 2
SFX 682 0 ончак .
SFX 682 0 ончаку .

SFX 683 N 3
SFX 683 0 ончакӣ .
SFX 683 0 ончакии .
SFX 683 0 ончакию .

SFX 684 N 17
SFX 684 0 ор .
SFX 684 0 орам .
SFX 684 0 орамон .
SFX 684 0 орамонро .
SFX 684 0 орамро .
SFX 684 0 оранд .
SFX 684 0 орат .
SFX 684 0 оратон .
SFX 684 0 оратонро .
SFX 684 0 ораш .
SFX 684 0 орашон .
SFX 684 0 орашонро .
SFX 684 0 орашро .
SFX 684 0 орем .
SFX 684 0 ори .
SFX 684 0 орро .
SFX 684 0 ору .

SFX 685 N 6
SFX 685 0 орҳо .
SFX 685 0 орҳои .
SFX 685 0 орҳоро .
SFX 685 0 орҳоят .
SFX 685 0 орҳояш .
SFX 685 0 орҳояшон .

SFX 686 N 1
SFX 686 0 орҳое .

SFX 687 N 7
SFX 687 0 орӣ .
SFX 687 0 ориаш .
SFX 687 0 ориву .
SFX 687 0 ории .
SFX 687 0 ориро .
SFX 687 0 орию .
SFX 687 0 орияш .

SFX 688 N 2
SFX 688 0 оргоҳ .
SFX 688 0 оргоҳи .

SFX 689 N 3
SFX 689 0 оре .
SFX 689 0 ореро .
SFX 689 0 орест .

SFX 690 N 2
SFX 690 0 ориҳо .
SFX 690 0 ориҳои .

SFX 691 N 5
SFX 691 0 орон .
SFX 691 0 оронам .
SFX 691 0 орони .
SFX 691 0 оронро .
SFX 691 0 орону .

SFX 692 N 3
SFX 692 0 ос .
SFX 692 0 осаш .
SFX 692 0 оси .

SFX 693 N 4
SFX 693 0 осӣ .
SFX 693 0 осиаш .
SFX 693 0 осии .
SFX 693 0 осиро .

SFX 694 N 1
SFX 694 0 осе .

SFX 695 N 1
SFX 695 0 осиҳоро .

SFX 696 N 5
SFX 696 0 осо .
SFX 696 0 осои .
SFX 696 0 осост .
SFX 696 0 осоямон .
SFX 696 0 осояш .

SFX 697 N 1
SFX 697 0 осое .

SFX 698 N 1
SFX 698 0 остӣ .

SFX 699 N 14
SFX 699 0 от .
SFX 699 0 отам .
SFX 699 0 отамон .
SFX 699 0 отамонро .
SFX 699 0 отамро .
SFX 699 0 отанд .
SFX 699 0 отатон .
SFX 699 0 оташ .
SFX 699 0 оташон .
SFX 699 0 оташонро .
SFX 699 0 оташро .
SFX 699 0 оти .
SFX 699 0 отро .
SFX 699 0 оту .

SFX 700 N 5
SFX 700 0 отҳо .
SFX 700 0 отҳои .
SFX 700 0 отҳоро .
SFX 700 0 отҳост .
SFX 700 0 отҳояш .

SFX 701 N 3
SFX 701 0 отҳое .
SFX 701 0 отҳоеанд .
SFX 701 0 отҳоеро .

SFX 702 N 9
SFX 702 0 отӣ .
SFX 702 0 отиам .
SFX 702 0 отиаш .
SFX 702 0 отиашонро .
SFX 702 0 отиву .
SFX 702 0 отиед .
SFX 702 0 отии .
SFX 702 0 отиро .
SFX 702 0 отию .

SFX 703 N 3
SFX 703 0 отар .
SFX 703 0 отари .
SFX 703 0 отару .

SFX 704 N 1
SFX 704 0 отарӣ .

SFX 705 N 2
SFX 705 0 отарин .
SFX 705 0 отарини .

SFX 706 N 1
SFX 706 0 отгар .

SFX 707 N 3
SFX 707 0 оте .
SFX 707 0 отеро .
SFX 707 0 отест .

SFX 708 N 1
SFX 708 0 отиҳо .

SFX 709 N 2
SFX 709 0 отие .
SFX 709 0 отиеро .

SFX 710 N 3
SFX 710 0 отиён .
SFX 710 0 отиёни .
SFX 710 0 отиёнро .

SFX 711 N 1
SFX 711 0 отмонанд .

SFX 712 N 1
SFX 712 0 отонӣ .

SFX 713 N 1
SFX 713 0 отро .

SFX 714 N 2
SFX 714 0 отчӣ .
SFX 714 0 отчии .

SFX 715 N 1
SFX 715 0 отчигии .

SFX 716 N 3
SFX 716 0 отчиён .
SFX 716 0 отчиёни .
SFX 716 0 отчиёнро .

SFX 717 N 1
SFX 717 0 отчиёне .

SFX 718 N 3
SFX 718 0 оянда .
SFX 718 0 ояндаву .
SFX 718 0 ояндаи .

SFX 719 N 1
SFX 719 0 ояндагӣ .

SFX 720 N 6
SFX 720 0 пона .
SFX 720 0 понаашонро .
SFX 720 0 понаву .
SFX 720 0 понаи .
SFX 720 0 понаро .
SFX 720 0 понаю .

SFX 721 N 3
SFX 721 0 со .
SFX 721 0 сои .
SFX 721 0 соят .

SFX 722 N 7
SFX 722 0 сон .
SFX 722 0 сонам .
SFX 722 0 сонанд .
SFX 722 0 сонаш .
SFX 722 0 сони .
SFX 722 0 сонро .
SFX 722 0 сону .

SFX 723 N 1
SFX 723 0 сонӣ .

SFX 724 N 1
SFX 724 0 соне .

SFX 725 N 1
SFX 725 0 сонон .

SFX 726 N 13
SFX 726 0 сор .
SFX 726 0 сорам .
SFX 726 0 соранд .
SFX 726 0 соранду .
SFX 726 0 сорат .
SFX 726 0 соратон .
SFX 726 0 сораш .
SFX 726 0 сорашро .
SFX 726 0 соред .
SFX 726 0 сорем .
SFX 726 0 сори .
SFX 726 0 сорро .
SFX 726 0 сору .

SFX 727 N 1
SFX 727 0 сорҳо .

SFX 728 N 1
SFX 728 0 сорҳое .

SFX 729 N 8
SFX 729 0 сорӣ .
SFX 729 0 сориаш .
SFX 729 0 сориашонро .
SFX 729 0 сориву .
SFX 729 0 сории .
SFX 729 0 сориро .
SFX 729 0 сорист .
SFX 729 0 сорию .

SFX 730 N 2
SFX 730 0 соре .
SFX 730 0 сореро .

SFX 731 N 2
SFX 731 0 сориҳо .
SFX 731 0 сориҳои .

SFX 732 N 9
SFX 732 0 сорон .
SFX 732 0 соронамон .
SFX 732 0 соронанд .
SFX 732 0 соронат .
SFX 732 0 соронаш .
SFX 732 0 соронем .
SFX 732 0 сорони .
SFX 732 0 соронро .
SFX 732 0 сорону .

SFX 733 N 6
SFX 733 0 сорона .
SFX 733 0 соронаам .
SFX 733 0 соронааш .
SFX 733 0 соронаи .
SFX 733 0 соронаро .
SFX 733 0 соронаю .

SFX 734 N 2
SFX 734 0 соронае .
SFX 734 0 соронаеро .

SFX 735 N 1
SFX 735 0 сороне .

SFX 736 N 2
SFX 736 0 сортарин .
SFX 736 0 сортарини .

SFX 737 N 1
SFX 737 0 стӣ .

SFX 738 N 1
SFX 738 0 ста .

SFX 739 N 4
SFX 739 0 стон .
SFX 739 0 стони .
SFX 739 0 стонро .
SFX 739 0 стону .

SFX 740 N 3
SFX 740 0 стонӣ .
SFX 740 0 стониамон .
SFX 740 0 стониро .

SFX 741 N 1
SFX 741 0 стониён .

SFX 742 N 14
SFX 742 0 тар .
SFX 742 0 тарам .
SFX 742 0 тарамон .
SFX 742 0 таранд .
SFX 742 0 тарат .
SFX 742 0 таратон .
SFX 742 0 тараш .
SFX 742 0 тарашон .
SFX 742 0 тарашро .
SFX 742 0 таред .
SFX 742 0 тарем .
SFX 742 0 тари .
SFX 742 0 тарро .
SFX 742 0 тару .

SFX 743 N 3
SFX 743 0 тарҳо .
SFX 743 0 тарҳоро .
SFX 743 0 тарҳояшон .

SFX 744 N 5
SFX 744 0 тарӣ .
SFX 744 0 тариашро .
SFX 744 0 тариву .
SFX 744 0 тарии .
SFX 744 0 тариро .

SFX 745 N 10
SFX 745 0 тара .
SFX 745 0 тараам .
SFX 745 0 тараамон .
SFX 745 0 тарааш .
SFX 745 0 тараашон .
SFX 745 0 тараашонро .
SFX 745 0 тараашро .
SFX 745 0 тараву .
SFX 745 0 тараи .
SFX 745 0 тараро .

SFX 746 N 1
SFX 746 0 тараҳо .

SFX 747 N 4
SFX 747 0 тарак .
SFX 747 0 таракам .
SFX 747 0 тараки .
SFX 747 0 тараку .

SFX 748 N 1
SFX 748 0 таракак .

SFX 749 N 1
SFX 749 0 тараке .

SFX 750 N 2
SFX 750 0 таракон .
SFX 750 0 тараконро .

SFX 751 N 3
SFX 751 0 таре .
SFX 751 0 тареро .
SFX 751 0 тарест .

SFX 752 N 11
SFX 752 0 тарин .
SFX 752 0 таринам .
SFX 752 0 таринанд .
SFX 752 0 таринатон .
SFX 752 0 таринаш .
SFX 752 0 таринашон .
SFX 752 0 таринашонро .
SFX 752 0 таринашро .
SFX 752 0 тарини .
SFX 752 0 таринро .
SFX 752 0 тарину .
