third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.dic
ҳинду/25,852,147,27,193,9,223,29,30,859,524,14,739,740,741,21,23
ҳунг/131,692,695
ҷиҳоз/25,29,859,524,663,667,669,661,699,15
биҳишт/25,852,2,4,6,7,195,29,859,862,853,409,855,863,552,696,697,14,15
бикӯч/661
вораҳ/852,1,366,369,382,31,651,655,669,661
гард/25,852,1,64,2,91,4,104,109,5,7,229,302,29,10,11,859,366,368,369,370,382,426,474,475,489,496,497,516,862,552,569,580,31,636,649,651,655,657,661,663,668,669,14,15
гурба/25,4,5,8,7,195,9,223,28,291,29,859,552,14,722,725,787,16
даст/25,852,64,65,75,68,82,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,195,198,224,227,254,255,256,258,29,11,859,853,862,402,855,426,431,31,720,14,15,789
дурахш/1,104,109,7,29,859,366,369,382,474,569,31,679,680,15
зулф/25,852,64,82,5,7,29,859,552,31,678,14,15
иттило/29,859,699,700,702,707,712
кам/852,64,70,2,4,7,29,11,859,402,414,855,421,853,862,856,552,580,14,722,742,743,744,747,748,751,752,754,759,15
каш/852,1,64,2,839,4,104,109,842,7,29,10,11,859,853,366,368,369,370,372,374,378,382,383,384,474,476,475,502,516,862,31,636,649,651,655,657,661,663,669,15
лак/852,5,7,29,859,853,580,655,15
лоларух/29,859,31,677,14,726
мӯҳмал/35,29,344,699,713,15
маъракаоро/852,853,738
мегузар/852,1,2,4,10,11,31,649,650,651,654,661,663,665
мерас/852,1,2,4,10,11,366,368,369,374,382,31,649,651,654,661,663,666
мечар/1,4,366,369,31,661
муҳит/25,852,3,4,7,29,859,696,14,15
нагузар/1,4,104,10,11,31,636,651,655,661,662,663,669
най/25,852,29,337,338,341,859,421,453,552,554,14,722,723,724,729,786,787,789,796,802,804,16
обрафт/684,691
парр/104,105,106,108,112,114,115,859,366,382,474,31,636,649,651,654,655,657,661,663,669,682,15
пархош/25,224,231,229,237,254,29,859,14,744,15
пешсаф/852,4,859,853,855,31,14,743,752,15
пуршараф/29,859,627,14,752,15
рӯҳ/25,852,2,3,857,94,4,5,6,7,8,142,140,145,29,859,853,862,402,414,855,863,31,672,673,674,14,15
раҳ/25,852,1,68,2,857,4,5,7,140,142,195,206,29,11,859,853,366,369,382,552,555,557,559,31,636,651,655,649,661,662,663,669,14,15
рабб/859,31,672
равшанибахш/29,859,855,581,698
саргард/852,474,580,31,659,679
сарзинда/2,28,742
сахт/25,852,70,2,857,5,7,8,29,859,344,345,853,360,402,409,855,862,863,627,14,742,747,752,15
содиқ/33,852,2,4,6,7,8,29,859,421,856,584,586,31,627,14,751,752,15
сохт/25,852,35,36,39,43,58,2,839,91,94,95,97,4,858,7,8,29,10,11,859,853,684,685,686,687,689,15
соя/25,35,2,5,7,8,140,141,144,163,195,9,223,224,244,254,29,859,539,552,571,14,726,735,846,759,786,16
суман/25,33,64,5,7,29,337,859,453,14,721,15
суол/25,2,857,6,7,8,29,859,699,14,15
тӯл/852,7,859,404,855,31,672,675,15
таҷҳиз/859,655,663,669,31,699,700,701,707
таассур/859,699,700,701,707
таблиғ/229,237,29,859,699,702,707,714,717,716,14,15
тадқиқ/25,852,7,229,237,859,855,699,700,701,702,707,714,716,717,15
тарғиб/229,231,237,859,699,702,715,716,714,15
тарк/1,2,4,104,5,7,859,366,369,382,474,475,31,636,651,655,663,669,671,676
тарс/852,1,2,839,4,104,109,7,248,274,29,10,11,859,366,368,369,374,382,569,577,31,636,649,650,651,653,655,657,661,663,669,670,671,676,682,683,14,15
тафтиш/25,229,237,254,859,855,853,699,701,700,702,709,714,14,15
ташвиқ/8,229,859,853,699,700,702,706,707,709,716,714,14,15
фаҳм/852,1,2,4,104,7,29,10,11,859,366,368,369,382,384,855,474,475,476,519,31,636,649,651,655,657,661,663,669,671,14,15
фаввора/25,859,696,14,722
ханд/1,64,2,4,104,35,10,852,366,368,369,371,382,31,634,636,649,651,655,656,669,682
хизматрас/31,625,659,660,669
хирр/692,693,694
хок/25,852,35,36,43,58,2,93,857,4,5,6,7,140,195,302,29,11,337,859,853,402,409,855,421,453,862,863,856,552,601,14,722,726,729,730,731,732,733,734,736,15
хурмо/25,852,9,231,29,337,859,14,846,739,23
хушгуфт/684,687,689
хушрафт/684,687,689
часп/1,64,68,75,104,109,115,366,369,374,380,382,474,31,651,654,649,655,663,669,661,676,679,15
чашма/25,2,3,4,5,195,9,29,859,14,722,726,727,728,730,732,16
чи/25,2,7,9,29,30,859,14,846,737,860,16,18,20,21
шаҳ/852,64,2,7,195,206,29,10,859,853,862,580,31,14,722,724,15
шаҳдгуфт/684
шараққ/852,692,693
шарр/852,64,5,29,859,692,15
ширингуфт/684,687,689,690
шох/25,64,2,5,7,29,859,421,14,726,730,732,15,787,790,789,796
шукуф/852,1,2,104,580,581,31,655,663,669,703
эҳтиёҷ/25,6,7,29,859,539,546,547,699,701,707,14,15
